Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201871-203
Barbering; exemptions.

The following persons are exempt from the Barber Act while in the proper discharge of their professional or occupational duties: (1) Persons authorized by the laws of this state to practice medicine and surgery; (2) commissioned medical or surgical officers of the United States military services; (3) registered or licensed practical nurses; and (4) persons engaged in operating or employed in cosmetology establishments, except that nothing contained in this section shall authorize a cosmetologist to perform barbering as defined in section 71-202 in any licensed barber shop.

Laws 1927, c. 163, § 3, p. 428;

Laws 1929, c. 154, § 2, p. 534;

C.S.1929, § 71-2003;

R.S.1943, § 71-203;

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 3, p. 1316;

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 6;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 86;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 80.
July 19, 2018
Provisions of this section regulating haircutting and providing for a certificate of registration are exclusive in nature. Lane v. State, 120 Neb. 302, 232 N.W. 96 (1930).